Hawaii statutes.
TITLE 30.
GUARDIANS AND TRUSTEES

Chapter

551 Guardians and Wards

551A Office of the Public Guardian

551D Uniform Durable Power of Attorney Act--Repealed

551E Uniform Power of Attorney Act

551G Uniform Adult Guardianship and Protective
Proceedings

Jurisdiction Act

552 Uniform Veteran's Guardianship Act--Repealed

553 Uniform Gifts to Minors Act--Repealed

553A Uniform Transfers to Minors Act

554 Trusts and Trustees; Accounts

554A Uniform Trustees' Powers Act

554B Uniform Custodial Trust Act

554C Uniform Prudent Investor Act

554G Permitted Transfers in Trust

555 Employees Trust

556 Uniform Fiduciaries Act

557 Revised Uniform Principal and Income
Act--Repealed

557A Uniform Principal and Income Act

558 Land Trusts--Beneficiary Controlled

Cross References

Uniform Probate Code, see chapter 560, Article V.

CHAPTER
551

GUARDIANS
AND WARDS

General Provisions

Section

551-1 Jurisdiction

551-2 Guardian ad litem; next friend;
appointment

Guardian of Minors

551-11 to 13 Repealed

Testamentary Guardians of Minors

551-16, 17 Repealed

Guardians and Disposition of Small Estates

551-21 Small estates; clerk of the court to act
when

551-22 Estates less than $100

Guardians of Insane Persons and Spendthrifts

551-26 to 34 Repealed

551-35 Natural guardian and conservator of person
alleged to

be incapacitated or in need of protective
proceedings

Guardians of Nonresidents

551-41 to 43 Repealed

Conservator for Absentee

551-46 to 48 Repealed

General Powers and Duties of Guardians

551-51 to 64 Repealed

Sale of Real Estate

551-71 to 91 Repealed

Cross References

Uniform disclaimer of property interests act, see chapter
526.

Rules of Court

See Hawaii Probate Rules.

Applicability of Hawaii Rules of Civil Procedure, see HRCP
rule 81(a)(2), (f), (g), (h), (j).

Proceedings not governed by Hawaii Rules of Civil Procedure,
see RCC rule 31.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next